Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202283-154
Money to credit of inmate or patient; claim; failure to assert; disposition.

Upon the failure to assert a claim for money within two years as prescribed by section 83-153, the Department of Health and Human Services, the Department of Correctional Services, or the Department of Veterans' Affairs shall transfer such money to a special fund to be set up for the use and benefit of all the inmates or patients of the institution in which the deceased or discharged inmate or patient was confined.

Laws 1953, c. 352, § 2, p. 1128;

Laws 1973, LB 563, § 35;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 917;

Laws 2018, LB827, § 5.